Arkansas, session 2025, SB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Providers in the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the
Elderly are required to provide all-inclusive care for patients;
(2) All-inclusive care is often provided in homes;
(3) The agreements between the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services, the providers in the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly
in this state, and the Department of Human Services provide that home
healthcare services shall be provided by providers in the Program of All-
Inclusive Care for the Elderly as part of their licensure; and
(4) However, providers in the Program of All-Inclusive Care for
the Elderly are not home healthcare service providers.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to exempt or except
providers in the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly from the
*JMB141*
02/03/2025 10:59:11 AM JMB141

SB180
licensing requirements under § 20-10-801 et seq., for home healthcare
services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-10-802, concerning the exceptions from
home healthcare services licensing requirements, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(13) A licensed, certified Program of All-Inclusive Care for the
Elderly provider in good standing under the administration of the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and providing services to enrolled Program of All-Inclusive
Care for the Elderly participants as part of the participants' documented
individual care plans within the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the
Elderly.
























02/03/2025 10:59:11 AM JMB141